test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-oknya_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

# todo: 
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Noun - окня: # Noun 'a window'
     окня+N+Sg+Nom: окня
     окня+N+Sg+Gen: окнян
     окня+N+Sg+Acc: окням
     окня+N+Sg+Com: окняге
     окня+N+Sg+Dat: окнялан
     окня+N+Sg+Ine: окняшты
     окня+N+Sg+Ill: окняшкы
     окня+N+Sg+Lat: окняэш
     окня+N+Sg+Cmpr: окняла
     окня+N+Sg+Abe: окняде

     окня+N+Pl+Nom: окнявлӓ

     окня+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: окняэм
     окня+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: окняэт
     окня+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: окняжы
     окня+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: окняна
     окня+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: окняда
     окня+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: окняшты
